Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Chapter 14

Private Roads

54-14-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 1868-1869, ch. 14, § 1; Shan., § 1634; Code 1932, § 2745; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1901; Acts 1981, ch. 185, §§ 1-3; 1992, ch. 897, § 1; 2000, ch. 940, § 2; 2008, ch. 1075, § 1; 2008, ch. 1082, §§ 1, 5, 6; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 703, § 1, effective June 22, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-14-101, concerned way of ingress and egress.

54-14-102.
Condemnation to secure way of ingress and egress and extending utility lines — Jurisdiction — Joinder of parties in action.

A person owning any land, where ingress or egress to and from which is cut off or obstructed entirely from a public road or highway by the intervening land of another, or who has no outlet from the land to a public road in the state, by reason of the intervening land of another, is given the right to have a private easement or right-of-way not exceeding twenty-five feet (25') condemned and set aside for the benefit of the land over and across the intervening land for the purpose of ingress and egress and extending utility lines, including, but not limited to, electric, natural gas, water, sewage, telephone, or cable television to the enclosed land. Maintenance of the easement or right-of-way shall be the responsibility of the person granted the easement or right-of- way. Gates or fencing that restricts access to the subservient land may not be erected. In counties with a metropolitan form of government, the maximum permissible width for an easement or right-of-way is fifteen feet (15').

The chancery and circuit courts and county courts, the latter acting by and through the county mayor, are given concurrent jurisdiction in such matters.

As many different owners of lands as may be cut off or obstructed or deprived of adequate and convenient outlets may join together against any number of different owners of intervening lands as wish to have the easement or right-of-way so condemned and set aside to them over the intervening property, and the joining shall not make the proceedings multifarious.

Acts 1921, ch. 75, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1634a1; Code 1932, § 2746; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1902; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2020, ch. 703, § 2.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “A person owning any land, where” for “any person owning lands,”, “land” for the second through sixth occurrences of “lands”, deleted “adequate and convenient” preceding “outlet from the”, substituted “a private easement” for “an easement”, inserted “not exceeding twenty-five feet (25')”, and “for the purpose of ingress and egress and extending utility lines, including, but not limited to, electric, natural gas, water, sewage, telephone,”, substituted “cable television to the enclosed land.” for “property.” and added the last three sentences.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 703, § 6. June 22, 2020.

Cross-References. Operations pending appeal of eminent domain, § 29-16-120.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, §§ 14, 71; 21 Tenn. Juris., Private Ways, §§ 3, 8.

Law Reviews.

Easements in Tennessee, 24 Tenn. L. Rev. 219.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of proposed amendment of § 54-14-109, OAG 98-039 (2/9/98).

Cited: Melton v. Donnell, 173 Tenn. 19, 114 S.W.2d 49, 1937 Tenn. LEXIS 7 (1938); Outdoor Mgmt. v. Thomas, 249 S.W.3d 368, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 222 (Tenn. Ct. App. Apr. 18, 2007).

54-14-103. Parties to petition to secure easement or right-of-way — Appraisal of land — Documents of internal improvements — Contents of petition — Costs bond.

The person or persons desiring to secure an easement or right-of-way may file their petition in the county where any of the lands affected by the proceedings lie:

Making all parties owning or interested in any or interested in any way in the lands, or property to be affected by the easement or right-of-way parties defendant to the proceedings; provided, that, if one of the parcels surrounding the land is owned by the federal government, the petitioner is not required to make the federal government, or any agency or instrumentality of the federal government, a party defendant to the petition for easement or right-of-way when the portion of land or property desired for the easement or right-of-way filed by the petitioner is over lands or property not owned by the federal government, or any agency or instrumentality of the federal government;

Setting out the portions of land or property desired for the easement or right-of-way and the amount, extent, and location of the land or property desired;

Setting out the name or names of the owners or those interested in any way in land or property or to be affected by the proceedings, or if unknown or their residence or citizenship cannot be ascertained by diligent inquiry, the facts are to be stated;

Setting out the object for which the easement or right-of-way is wanted; and

Praying that a sufficient amount of the property be set apart by metes and bounds for the easement or right-of-way and that petitioners be put into possession of the property.

Upon the filing of a petition by the person desiring to secure the easement or right-of-way, the court shall appoint an appraiser to conduct an appraisal of the parcel of land or rights in the land or incident to the land a portion of which is wanted. The cost of the appraisal shall be borne by the person seeking to appropriate the land. Upon completion, the appraisal shall be filed with the court and within thirty (30) days of the filing, the person seeking to appropriate the land shall post a bond for two (2) times the amount of the appraisal. The appraisal shall be conducted for the sole purpose of determining the amount of the bond and shall not be admissible as evidence.

Upon the request of any party or the court, after the filing of the petition, the person seeking to appropriate the land shall provide a copy of any and all prospective building plans, construction specifications, or similar documents related to the work of internal improvement to take place on the land.

Bond shall be given for costs, and copy and process shall issue or publication be made for nonresidents or those whose residence or citizenship is unknown and cannot be ascertained by diligent inquiry, for the defendants named as in chancery cases.

All persons made defendants, and unborn beneficiaries of the remainder interests, shall be bound by the proceedings.

Acts 1921, ch. 75, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1634a2; Code 1932, § 2747; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1903; Acts 1999, ch. 362, § 1; 2008, ch. 1082, § 2.

Amendments. The 2008 amendment added the proviso to the end of (a)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2008, ch. 1082, § 7. June 3, 2008.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 45.

Cited: Lipscomb v. Doe, 32 S.W.3d 840, 2000 Tenn. LEXIS 663 (Tenn. 2000); Wolfe v. Jaeger, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 108 (Tenn. Ct. App. Mar. 19, 2009).

54-14-104. Jury of view ordered summoned to inquire of and assess damages.

If pro confesso is taken against the defendants or if, upon answer filed by any of the defendants, or upon a trial upon the merits by the court, no sufficient cause is shown to the court why the easement or right-of-way should not be granted to petitioners, the court shall issue a writ of inquiry of damages to the sheriff, commanding the sheriff to summon a jury to inquire of and assess the damages.

By consent of the parties, or unless defense is made by the defendants within the time required in chancery cases, the writ of inquiry may be issued by the clerk of the court to the sheriff to summon the jury of view.

Acts 1921, ch. 75, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1634a3; Code 1932, § 2748; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1904.

Cited: Vinson v. Nashville, C. & S. L. Ry., 45 Tenn. App. 161, 321 S.W.2d 841, 1958 Tenn. App. LEXIS 120 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1958).

54-14-105. Jury of view — Qualification — Number — Challenges.

The jury of view shall consist of five (5) disinterested persons having all of the qualifications of jurors in the circuit court, unless the parties agree otherwise or upon a different number, and either party may challenge for cause or peremptorily as in other civil cases.

Acts 1921, ch. 75, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1634a3½; Code 1932, § 2749; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1905.

54-14-106. Notice of taking inquest of damages.

The sheriff shall give the parties or their agent, if residents of the county where the suit is pending, three (3) days' notice of the time and place of taking the inquest, unless the time has been fixed by order of the court.

Acts 1921, ch. 75, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1634a4; Code 1932, § 2750; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1906.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Private Ways, § 3.

54-14-107. Oath of jury of view.

Before proceeding to act, the jury shall be sworn by the sheriff to fairly and impartially and without fear or favor to perform their duties as jurors, and to lay off by metes and bounds lands suitable for the easement or right-of-way and to inquire of and to assess the damages.

Acts 1921, ch. 75, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1634a5; Code 1932, § 2751; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1907.

54-14-108. Jury to set apart by metes and bounds and assess damages.

The jury will then proceed to examine the ground and may hear testimony, but no argument of counsel, and set apart by metes and bounds a sufficient quantity of the land or property for the purposes intended, and assess the damages occasioned to the parties interested or affected by the property taken.

Acts 1921, ch. 75, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1634a6; Code 1932, § 2752; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1908.

54-14-109. Estimates of damages — Elements.

In estimating the damages, the jury shall give the cash value of the property taken and any incidental damages, but incidental benefits that may result to the owner by reason of the proposed easement or right-of-way being granted may be set off against incidental damages.

Acts 1921, ch. 75, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1634a7; Code 1932, § 2753; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1909; Acts 1998, ch. 670, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of proposed amendment of this section, OAG 98-039 (2/9/98).

Collateral References.

Easement, right of owner of dominant estate to have compensation for taking of, by eminent domain determined with reference to land and improvements held in the dominant estate. 98 A.L.R. 640.

Fixtures or chattels used in connection with real property taken or damaged, compensation in respect of. 90 A.L.R. 159.

54-14-110. Report of jury — Contents.

The report of the jury shall be made in writing and signed by a majority of the jurors, setting out the amount of damages to each defendant and the locality and extent of the easement granted, and delivered to and returned by the sheriff into the court.

Acts 1921, ch. 75, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1634a8; Code 1932, § 2754; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1910.

54-14-111. Location of easement or right-of-way.

The jury is authorized to locate the easement or right-of-way at a place where the easement or right-of-way will be of service to the petitioner and cause the least amount of monetary damage as practicable to the value of the intervening land.

Acts 1921, ch. 75, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1634a9; Code 1932, § 2755; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1911; 2020, ch. 703, § 4.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “is” for “shall be” and “a place where the” for “the place set out in the petition or at any other place, care being taken to locate the”, deleted “where it” following “right-of-way”, substituted “petitioner and cause the least amount of monetary” for “petitioners and occasion as little” and “value of the intervening land” for “defendants”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 703, § 6. June 22, 2020.

54-14-112. Report confirmed, or set aside and another writ awarded.

Any party may file objections to the report; provided, that, if an objection is filed by the owner or owners of land selected by the jury of view, the objection must be served upon all parties to the action. Further, the person making the objection must prepare a plat that contains an alternative route to the one identified by the jury of view. The plat shall be served on all parties and filed with the court within thirty (30) days of the objection. The alternative route that the person proposes to substitute for the identified route shall be clearly marked on the plat. If the petitioner or any other party who owns the land on which all or part of the alternative route is located objects to the alternative route, the only remedy available to the petitioner or other party at the trial court level is to demand a trial by jury pursuant to § 54-14-114. An appeal from an adverse decision at the trial court level may be appealed by any party to the action as provided by law.

If no objection is filed to the report or upon objections being filed to the report and heard and considered by the court, the report may be confirmed by the court, or set aside and another writ of inquiry awarded by the court.

Acts 1921, ch. 75, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1634a10; Code 1932, § 2756; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1912; Acts 2008, ch. 1082, § 3.

Amendments. The 2008 amendment, in (a), added the proviso to the end of the first sentence and the second through sixth sentences.

Effective Dates. Acts 2008, ch. 1082, § 7. June 3, 2008.

54-14-113. Report modified, and easement of way granted, upon payment of damages, costs, and, if awarded, attorney's fees.

The report may be modified by the court and the easement or right-of-way may be granted or decreed to the petitioners as the court may deem proper upon the payment to the defendant, or to the clerk of the court for the defendant's use, of the damages assessed, with costs and, if awarded pursuant to subsection (b), attorney's fees.

In addition to the damages and costs awarded to the defendant as provided by §§ 54-14-103 and 54-14-109, the court may award reasonable attorney's fees to the defendant. The court shall not award attorney's fees if the court finds the defendant has acted in bad faith.

Acts 1921, ch. 75, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1634a11; Code 1932, § 2757; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1913; 2020, ch. 703, § 5.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (a), deleted “to” preceding “the court may”, substituted “deem” for “seem”, deleted “and the right in the premises” preceding “upon the payment”, substituted “the defendant, or” for “the defendants or” and “the defendant’s use” for “their use”, and inserted “and, if awarded pursuant to subsection (b), attorney's fees.”; and added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 703, § 6. June 22, 2020.

Cited: Vinson v. Nashville, C. & S. L. Ry., 45 Tenn. App. 161, 321 S.W.2d 841, 1958 Tenn. App. LEXIS 120 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1958); Wolfe v. Jaeger, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 108 (Tenn. Ct. App. Mar. 19, 2009).

54-14-114. Appeal from jury of view — New trial before a jury summoned in usual way — Exclusive remedy.

Within thirty (30) days, either party may appeal to the court from the finding of the jury of view, and demand a trial by a jury and, upon giving security for costs, may have a new trial before a jury of twelve (12) persons to be summoned and impaneled by the court in the usual way.

The demand for a trial by a jury in accordance with subsection (a) shall be the exclusive remedy for relief from the finding of a jury of view and no other appeal from the finding shall lie. The jury must either affirm the finding of the jury of view or set apart a different quantity of land or property for ingress or egress to the land of the petitioner; but, in no event, shall the party petitioning for a right of way pursuant to this part be left without a sufficient outlet of ingress and egress.

Acts 1921, ch. 75, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1634a12; Code 1932, § 2758; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1914; Acts 2008, ch. 1082, § 4.

Amendments. The 2008 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2008, ch. 1082, § 7. June 3, 2008.

54-14-115. Verdict affirming jury of view or more unfavorable to appellant — Costs.

If the verdict of the jury upon the trial affirms the finding of the jury of view, or is more unfavorable to the appellant than the finding of the jury, the costs shall be adjudged against the appellant; otherwise, the court may award costs as in chancery cases.

Acts 1921, ch. 75, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1634a13; Code 1932, § 2759; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1915.

54-14-116. Writ of possession to petitioners.

Upon the hearing of the case by the court or upon the judgment being pronounced on the verdict of the jury, the court may order a writ of possession to issue to place the petitioners in possession of the easement or right-of-way awarded to them.

Acts 1921, ch. 75, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1634a14; Code 1932, § 2760; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1916.

54-14-117. Easement belongs to owners of lands benefited — Reversion when not used.

The easement or right-of-way shall belong to the owners of the lands benefited by the easement or right-of-way, and continue as long as the easement or right-of-way is used and maintained by them, their heirs or assigns, but upon the easement or right-of-way falling into nonuse or when the easement or right-of-way is not maintained or kept up, it shall cease and the original owner or owners of the servient land, their heirs or assigns may take possession of the easement or right-of-way to the exclusion of all other parties.

Acts 1921, ch. 75, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1634a15; Code 1932, § 2761; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1917.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 72.

Cited: Bradley v. McLeod, 984 S.W.2d 929, 1998 Tenn. App. LEXIS 547 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1998).

54-14-118. Mutual use easement or right-of-way.

In lieu of the absolute easement or right-of-way provided for in this chapter, the court, in its discretion, may grant a mutual use easement or right-of-way to the petitioner or petitioners and the owner or owners of the servient land. Under a mutual use easement or right-of-way, the petitioner shall be required to pay the damages assessed by the jury and the costs, ownership to the land shall not be affected and both the petitioner and the owner of the servient land shall have the right to use the easement or right-of-way.

Acts 1991, ch. 337, § 1.

54-14-119. No right to easement or right-of-way if cut-off or obstruction result of intentional and knowing action of the owner of surrounding land.

Notwithstanding § 54-14-102, there is no right to have an easement or right-of-way condemned and set aside for the benefit of the land surrounded or enclosed by the lands of any other person if the court determines that the ingress or egress to and from the surrounded or enclosed land is cut off or obstructed entirely from a public road or highway as a result of the intentional and knowing action of the owner of the surrounded or enclosed land.

Acts 2020, ch. 703, § 3.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 703, § 6. June 22, 2020.